California, session 20252026, SB729.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8586.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:8586.4. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Nonprofit organization” means a tax-exempt organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.(2) “State agency” means any of the following:(A) Office of Emergency Services.(B) Department of General Services.(C) Department of Housing and Community Development.(D) Department of Insurance.(E) Franchise Tax Board.(b) A state agency shall establish a nonprofit liaison for nonprofit organizations to contact during a state of emergency.(1) The nonprofit liaison shall do both of the following:(A) Coordinate with state entities and local agencies to provide resources and information to nonprofit organizations during state of emergency relief efforts, including, but not limited to, providing information about access to grants and reducing barriers.(B) Support nonprofit organization efforts for increased access to available grants during state of emergency response periods.(2) The nonprofit liaison role shall be combined with existing roles in the state agency.SECTION 1.Section 51238.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:51238.5.(a)If an owner of land agrees to permit the use of their land for free public recreation, the board or council may agree to indemnify the owner against all claims arising from that public use. The owner’s agreement that the land be used for free, public recreation shall not be construed as an implied dedication to that use.(b)If an owner of land agrees to permit the use of their land for agricultural laborer housing facilities authorized pursuant to Section 51238, the city, county, housing authority, state agency, or nonprofit organization may indemnify the owner against all claims arising from that use.